src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-meeg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - mēg: # pronouns 6 'eng /est meie/fin' - full paradigm
     mēg+N+Pl+Nom: mēg
     mēg+N+Pl+Gen: [mäʼd, mäd]
     mēg+N+Pl+Par: mēḑi
     mēg+N+Pl+Dat: [mäʼddõn, mäddõn]
     mēg+N+Pl+Ins: [mäʼdkõks, mädkõks]
     mēg+N+Pl+Ill: [mēʼži, mēži]
     mēg+N+Pl+Ela: mēšti
